Connecticut, session 2026, HB05345.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 5-259a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Third-party administrator" means any person who directly or
indirectly underwrites, collects premiums or charges from, or adjusts or
settles claims on, residents of this state in connection with health
coverage offered or provided by the Comptroller pursuant to the state
employee plan, as provided in section 5-259;
(2) "Provider" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-508c;
and
(3) "Affiliated provider" has the same meaning as provided in section
19a-508c.
LCO No. 2151 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5345
(b) Employee health and life insurance shall be subject to a
competitive selection process. The process shall be in accordance with
the provisions of the collectively bargained pension agreement
approved by the General Assembly on June 30, 1982.
(c) Any third-party administrator, including, but not limited to, any
insurer, health carrier or health benefits administrator, selected in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, that
enters into a contract or other agreement with the state to provide health
insurance under a group hospitalization and medical and surgical
insurance plan procured by the Comptroller pursuant to section 5-259,
or any health insurance claim processing services or administrative
services pursuant to such contract or agreement, shall:
(1) Provide at least three written notices to the Comptroller, the
Health Care Cost Containment Committee, as defined in section 3-
123rrr, the president pro tempore of the Senate, the speaker of the House
of Representatives and the minority leaders of the Senate and House of
Representatives, at not less than ninety days, sixty days and thirty days
prior to the expiration or termination of any participating provider
agreement between such third-party administrator and (A) any hospital
licensed pursuant to chapter 368v, (B) any health care practice of
affiliated providers, or (C) a parent corporation of such hospital or
health care practice of affiliated providers. Such notices shall include the
anticipated date of the applicable agreement expiration or termination
and the date of expiration of the applicable sixty-day notice period
required under subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of
section 38a-472f; and
(2) Immediately notify the Comptroller, the Health Care Cost
Containment Committee and the legislative leaders listed in subdivision
(1) of this subsection of (A) any new, extended or amended participating
provider agreement entered into between the third-party administrator
and an entity listed in subparagraph (A), (B) or (C) of subdivision (1) of
this subsection, or (B) the expiration of the applicable notice period
LCO No. 2151 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5345
required under subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of
section 38a-472f which results in the hospital or health care practice of
affiliated providers no longer being a participating provider in the third-
party administrator's provider network.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the
Comptroller shall, not later than sixty days after the receipt of notice of
expiration of any notice period pursuant to section 38a-472f, as
described in subsection (c) of this section, commence a competitive
process for the selection of a third-party administrator of health
insurance, health insurance claim processing services or administrative
services in accordance with subsection (b) of this section and any third-
party administrator that submitted a notice of termination as described
in subsection (c) of this section shall be prohibited from participating in
any such competitive selection process for a period of up to five years
from the date of the Comptroller's receipt of the termination notice
under subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section, except the
Comptroller may reduce the time period of such prohibition.
(e) If the parties to the participating provider agreement that expired
or was terminated as described in subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of
this section agree to enter into a new, amended or extended
participating provider agreement not later than thirty days after the
Comptroller's receipt of the termination notice under said subdivision,
the Comptroller may suspend or cease the competitive selection process
commenced under subsection (d) of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 5-259a